District of Columbia statutes.
29-104.02

Entities required to designate and maintain registered agent.

The following shall designate and maintain a registered agent in the District:

(1)

A domestic filing entity;

(2)

A domestic limited liability partnership; and

(3)

A registered foreign entity.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(a)(17), 59 DCR 13171

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-105.11.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 deleted “that does not maintain a place of business in the District” following “partnership” in (2); and substituted “registered” for “qualified” in (3).

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.